Utah statutes.
32A-1-109 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Powers and duties of the director.
Subject to the powers and responsibilities vested in the commission by this
title the director shall:
(1)  prepare and propose to the commission general policies, directives,
rules, and procedures governing the administrative activities of the
department, and may submit other recommendations to the commission as the
director considers in the interest of the commission's or the department's
business;
(2)  within the general policies, directives, rules, and procedures of the
commission:
(a)  provide day-to-day direction, coordination, and delegation of
responsibilities in the administrative activities of the department's
business; and
(b)  make internal department policies, directives, rules, and procedures
relating to department personnel matters, and the day-to-day operation of the
department consistent with those of the commission;
(3) (a)  appoint or employ personnel as considered necessary in the
administration of this title;
(b)  prescribe the conditions of employment for the personnel described in
Subsection (3)(a);
(c)  define the respective duties and powers for the personnel described in
Subsection (3)(a);
(d)  fix the remuneration in accordance with Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State
Personnel Management Act, for the personnel described in Subsection (3)(a);
and
(e)  designate those employees required to give a bond and specify the bond
amounts;
(4)  establish and secure adherence to a system of reports, controls, and
performance in matters relating to personnel, security, department property
management, and operation of:
(a)  a department office;
(b)  a warehouse;
(c)  a state store;
(d)  a package agency; and
(e)  a licensee;
(5)  within the policies, directives, rules, and procedures approved by the
commission and provisions of law, buy, import, keep for sale, sell and control
the sale, storage, service, transportation, and delivery of an alcoholic
product;
(6)  prepare for commission approval:
(a)  recommendations regarding the location, establishment, relocation, and
closure of a state store or package agency;
(b)  recommendations regarding the issuance, suspension, nonrenewal, and
revocation of a license or permit;
(c)  an annual budget, proposed legislation, and reports as required by law
and sound business principles;
(d)  plans for reorganizing divisions of the department and the functions of
the divisions;
(e)  manuals containing commission and department policies, directives, rules,
and procedures;
(f)  an inventory control system;
(g)  any other report or recommendation as may be requested by the commission;
(h)  rules governing the credit terms of the sale of beer to a beer retailer
licensee;
(i)  rules governing the calibration, maintenance, and regulation of a
calibrated metered dispensing system;
(j)  rules governing the posting of a list of types and brand names of liquor
served through a calibrated metered dispensing system;
(k)  price lists issued and distributed showing the price to be paid for each
class, variety, or brand of liquor kept for sale at a state store, package
agency, or outlet;
(l)  directives prescribing the books of account kept by the department and by
a state store, package agency, or outlet; and
(m)  a policy prescribing the manner of giving and serving a notice required
by this title or rules made under this title;
(7)  make available through the department to any person, upon request, a copy
of a policy or directive made by the director;
(8)  keep a current copy of a manual that contains the rules and policies of
the department and commission available for public inspection;
(9) (a)  after consultation with the governor, determine whether an alcoholic
product should not be sold, offered for sale, or otherwise furnished in an
area of the state during a period of emergency that is proclaimed by the
governor to exist in that area; and
(b)  issue a necessary public announcement or directive with respect to the
determination described in Subsection (9)(a); and
(10)  perform other duties required by the commission and by law.
